Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,235
Act, how cited.

Sections 81-8,209 to 81-8,235 shall be known and may be cited as the State Tort Claims Act.

Laws 1969, c. 756, § 27, p. 2853;

Laws 1984, LB 590, § 3;

Laws 2007, LB564, § 6.